West Virginia, session 2025, HB2552.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 13. BUSINESS AND OCCUPATION TAX. §11-13-32. Reduction of tax for companies who employ residents of this state. (a) Legislative findings. – The Legislature finds that companies who employ residents of this state ensure that those workers will benefit the state's economy as a whole. Providing incentives to companies to hire local workers is a way to accomplish this mission.(b) Rate reduction established. – Companies in this state who employ at least 75 percent of their workforce using West Virginia residents shall be entitled to a 2.5 percent overall reduction for that company's business and occupation tax rate.(c) Requirements. – Companies must be able to provide evidence that 75 percent of their workforce are residents of this state in order to qualify for the credit. Additionally, the West Virginia Department of Tax and Revenue may issue guidance on the implementation of this credit. (d) Effective date. – This rate reduction provided for in this section shall take effect for the 2025 tax year and continuing thereafter.